Utah statutes.
32B-2-402.   Definitions -- Calculations.

(1)  As used in this part:

(a)  "Account" means the Alcoholic Beverage Enforcement and Treatment Restricted Account created in Section 32B-2-403.

(b)  "Advisory council" means the Utah Substance Abuse Advisory Council created in Section 63M-7-301.

(c)  "Alcohol-related offense" means:

(i)  a violation of:

(A)  Section 41-6a-502; or

(B)  an ordinance that complies with the requirements of:

(I)  Subsection 41-6a-510(1); or

(II)  Section 76-5-207; or

(ii)  an offense involving the illegal:

(A)  sale of an alcoholic product;

(B)  consumption of an alcoholic product;

(C)  distribution of an alcoholic product;

(D)  transportation of an alcoholic product; or

(E)  possession of an alcoholic product.

(d)  "Annual conviction time period" means the time period that:

(i)  begins on July 1 and ends on June 30; and

(ii)  immediately precedes the fiscal year for which an appropriation under this part is made.

(e)  "Municipality" means:

(i)  a city; or

(ii)  a town.

(2)  For purposes of Subsection 32B-2-404(1)(b)(iii), the number of premises located within the limits of a municipality or county:

(a)  is the number determined by the department to be so located;

(b)  includes the aggregate number of premises of the following:

(i)  a state store;

(ii)  a package agency; and

(iii)  a retail licensee; and

(c)  for a county, consists only of the number located within an unincorporated area of the county.

(3)  The department shall determine:

(a)  a population figure according to the most current population estimate prepared by the Utah Population Estimates Committee;

(b)  a county's population for the 25% distribution to municipalities and counties under Subsection 32B-2-404(1)(b)(i) only with reference to the population in the unincorporated areas of the county; and

(c)  a county's population for the 25% distribution to counties under Subsection 32B-2-404(1)(b)(iv) only with reference to the total population in the county, including that of a municipality.

(4) (a)  A conviction occurs in the municipality or county that actually prosecutes the offense to judgment.

(b)  If a conviction is based upon a guilty plea, the conviction is considered to occur in the municipality or county that, except for the guilty plea, would have prosecuted the offense.

